Utah statutes.
58-42a-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Occupational Therapy Licensing Board consisting of three licensed occupational therapists, one licensed occupational therapy assistant, and one member of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203, and in addition, the board shall:

(a)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional practice of occupational therapy and to advise the division with respect to these complaints; and

(b)  disqualify any member of the board from participating as a member of the board in its capacity as a presiding officer in any administrative procedure in which that member has reviewed the complaint or advised the division.



Enacted by Chapter 240, 1994 General Session

